Illinois, session 104th, HB3124.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the Reshore Our 5Supply Chains Tax Reform Act. 6    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 7changing Section 203 as follows: 8    (35 ILCS 5/203)  (from Ch. 120, par. 2-203)9    Sec. 203. Base income defined. 10    (a) Individuals.11        (1) In general. In the case of an individual, base 12    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's adjusted 13    gross income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph 14    (2).15        (2) Modifications. The adjusted gross income referred 16    to in paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto 17    the sum of the following amounts:18            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 19        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 20        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 21        in the computation of adjusted gross income, except 22        stock dividends of qualified public utilities   HB3124- 2 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        described in Section 305(e) of the Internal Revenue 2        Code;3            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 4        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 5        the computation of adjusted gross income for the 6        taxable year;7            (C) An amount equal to the amount received during 8        the taxable year as a recovery or refund of real 9        property taxes paid with respect to the taxpayer's 10        principal residence under the Revenue Act of 1939 and 11        for which a deduction was previously taken under 12        subparagraph (L) of this paragraph (2) prior to July 13        1, 1991, the retrospective application date of Article 14        4 of Public Act 87-17. In the case of multi-unit or 15        multi-use structures and farm dwellings, the taxes on 16        the taxpayer's principal residence shall be that 17        portion of the total taxes for the entire property 18        which is attributable to such principal residence;19            (D) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 20        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 21        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 22        computation of adjusted gross income;23            (D-5) An amount, to the extent not included in 24        adjusted gross income, equal to the amount of money 25        withdrawn by the taxpayer in the taxable year from a 26        medical care savings account and the interest earned   HB3124- 3 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        on the account in the taxable year of a withdrawal 2        pursuant to subsection (b) of Section 20 of the 3        Medical Care Savings Account Act or subsection (b) of 4        Section 20 of the Medical Care Savings Account Act of 5        2000;6            (D-10) For taxable years ending after December 31, 7        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation 8        costs that the individual deducted in computing 9        adjusted gross income and for which the individual 10        claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 201;11            (D-15) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 12        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 13        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 14        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 15        the Internal Revenue Code;16            (D-16) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 17        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 18        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 19        addition modification under subparagraph (D-15), then 20        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 21        deductions taken in all taxable years under 22        subparagraph (Z) with respect to that property.23            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 24        the last day of the last tax year for which a taxpayer 25        may claim a depreciation deduction for federal income 26        tax purposes a subtraction is allowed with respect to   HB3124- 4 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        that property under subparagraph (Z) and for which the 2        taxpayer was allowed in any taxable year to make a 3        subtraction modification under subparagraph (Z), then 4        an amount equal to that subtraction modification. 5            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 6        modification under this subparagraph only once with 7        respect to any one piece of property;8            (D-17) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 9        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 10        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 11        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 12        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 13        member of the same unitary business group but for the 14        fact that foreign person's business activity outside 15        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 16        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 17        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 18        who would be a member of the same unitary business 19        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 20        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 21        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 22        required to apportion business income under different 23        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 24        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 25        extent that dividends were included in base income of 26        the unitary group for the same taxable year and   HB3124- 5 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 2        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 3        included in gross income under Sections 951 through 4        964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts included 5        in gross income under Section 78 of the Internal 6        Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of the same 7        person to whom the interest was paid, accrued, or 8        incurred.9            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 10                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 11            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 12            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 13            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 14            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 15            with respect to such interest; or16                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 17            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 18            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 19            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 20            following:21                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 22                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 23                to a person that is not a related member, and24                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 25                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 26                person did not have as a principal purpose the   HB3124- 6 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 2                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 3                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 4                terms; or 5                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 6            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 7            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 8            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 9            and terms and the principal purpose for the 10            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 11            or 12                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 13            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 14            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 15            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 16            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 17            to the application or use of an alternative method 18            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 19                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 20            Director from making any other adjustment 21            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 22            for any tax year beginning after the effective 23            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 24            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 25            Department and such regulations provide methods 26            and standards by which the Department will utilize   HB3124- 7 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 2            (D-18) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 3        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 4        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 5        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 6        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 7        foreign person who would be a member of the same 8        unitary business group but for the fact that the 9        foreign person's business activity outside the United 10        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 11        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 12        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 13        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 14        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 15        from being included in the unitary business group 16        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 17        business income under different subsections of Section 18        304. The addition modification required by this 19        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 20        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 21        group for the same taxable year and received by the 22        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 23        business group (including amounts included in gross 24        income under Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal 25        Revenue Code and amounts included in gross income 26        under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) with   HB3124- 8 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        respect to the stock of the same person to whom the 2        intangible expenses and costs were directly or 3        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 4        sentence does not apply to the extent that the same 5        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 6        modification required under Section 203(a)(2)(D-17) of 7        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 8        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 9        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 10        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 11        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 12        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 13        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 14        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 15        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 16        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 17        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 18        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 19        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 20        similar types of intangible assets.21            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:22                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 23            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 24            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 25            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 26            than a state which requires mandatory unitary   HB3124- 9 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 2            with respect to such item; or3                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 4            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 5            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 6            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 7            following:8                    (a) the person during the same taxable 9                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 10                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 11                not a related member, and12                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 13                intangible expense or cost between the 14                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 15                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 16                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 17                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 18                or19                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 20            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 21            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 22            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 23            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 24            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 25            writing to the application or use of an 26            alternative method of apportionment under Section   HB3124- 10 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1            304(f); 2                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 3            Director from making any other adjustment 4            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 5            for any tax year beginning after the effective 6            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 7            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 8            Department and such regulations provide methods 9            and standards by which the Department will utilize 10            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 11            (D-19) For taxable years ending on or after 12        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 13        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 14        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 15        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 16        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 17        business group but for the fact that the person is 18        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 19        included in the unitary business group because he or 20        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 21        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 22        addition modification required by this subparagraph 23        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 24        included in base income of the unitary group for the 25        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 26        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group   HB3124- 11 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        (including amounts included in gross income under 2        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 3        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 4        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 5        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 6        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 7        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 8        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 9        the addition modification required under Section 10        203(a)(2)(D-17) or Section 203(a)(2)(D-18) of this 11        Act; 12            (D-20) For taxable years beginning on or after 13        January 1, 2002 and ending on or before December 31, 14        2006, in the case of a distribution from a qualified 15        tuition program under Section 529 of the Internal 16        Revenue Code, other than (i) a distribution from a 17        College Savings Pool created under Section 16.5 of the 18        State Treasurer Act or (ii) a distribution from the 19        Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund, an amount equal 20        to the amount excluded from gross income under Section 21        529(c)(3)(B). For taxable years beginning on or after 22        January 1, 2007, in the case of a distribution from a 23        qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the 24        Internal Revenue Code, other than (i) a distribution 25        from a College Savings Pool created under Section 16.5 26        of the State Treasurer Act, (ii) a distribution from   HB3124- 12 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        the Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund, or (iii) a 2        distribution from a qualified tuition program under 3        Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code that (I) 4        adopts and determines that its offering materials 5        comply with the College Savings Plans Network's 6        disclosure principles and (II) has made reasonable 7        efforts to inform in-state residents of the existence 8        of in-state qualified tuition programs by informing 9        Illinois residents directly and, where applicable, to 10        inform financial intermediaries distributing the 11        program to inform in-state residents of the existence 12        of in-state qualified tuition programs at least 13        annually, an amount equal to the amount excluded from 14        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(B).15            For the purposes of this subparagraph (D-20), a 16        qualified tuition program has made reasonable efforts 17        if it makes disclosures (which may use the term 18        "in-state program" or "in-state plan" and need not 19        specifically refer to Illinois or its qualified 20        programs by name) (i) directly to prospective 21        participants in its offering materials or makes a 22        public disclosure, such as a website posting; and (ii) 23        where applicable, to intermediaries selling the 24        out-of-state program in the same manner that the 25        out-of-state program distributes its offering 26        materials;  HB3124- 13 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1            (D-20.5) For taxable years beginning on or after 2        January 1, 2018, in the case of a distribution from a 3        qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of the 4        Internal Revenue Code, other than a distribution from 5        a qualified ABLE program created under Section 16.6 of 6        the State Treasurer Act, an amount equal to the amount 7        excluded from gross income under Section 529A(c)(1)(B) 8        of the Internal Revenue Code; 9            (D-21) For taxable years beginning on or after 10        January 1, 2007, in the case of transfer of moneys from 11        a qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the 12        Internal Revenue Code that is administered by the 13        State to an out-of-state program, an amount equal to 14        the amount of moneys previously deducted from base 15        income under subsection (a)(2)(Y) of this Section;16            (D-21.5) For taxable years beginning on or after 17        January 1, 2018, in the case of the transfer of moneys 18        from a qualified tuition program under Section 529 or 19        a qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of the 20        Internal Revenue Code that is administered by this 21        State to an ABLE account established under an 22        out-of-state ABLE account program, an amount equal to 23        the contribution component of the transferred amount 24        that was previously deducted from base income under 25        subsection (a)(2)(Y) or subsection (a)(2)(HH) of this 26        Section;   HB3124- 14 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1            (D-22) For taxable years beginning on or after 2        January 1, 2009, and prior to January 1, 2018, in the 3        case of a nonqualified withdrawal or refund of moneys 4        from a qualified tuition program under Section 529 of 5        the Internal Revenue Code administered by the State 6        that is not used for qualified expenses at an eligible 7        education institution, an amount equal to the 8        contribution component of the nonqualified withdrawal 9        or refund that was previously deducted from base 10        income under subsection (a)(2)(y) of this Section, 11        provided that the withdrawal or refund did not result 12        from the beneficiary's death or disability. For 13        taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018: 14        (1) in the case of a nonqualified withdrawal or 15        refund, as defined under Section 16.5 of the State 16        Treasurer Act, of moneys from a qualified tuition 17        program under Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code 18        administered by the State, an amount equal to the 19        contribution component of the nonqualified withdrawal 20        or refund that was previously deducted from base 21        income under subsection (a)(2)(Y) of this Section, and 22        (2) in the case of a nonqualified withdrawal or refund 23        from a qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of 24        the Internal Revenue Code administered by the State 25        that is not used for qualified disability expenses, an 26        amount equal to the contribution component of the   HB3124- 15 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        nonqualified withdrawal or refund that was previously 2        deducted from base income under subsection (a)(2)(HH) 3        of this Section;4            (D-23) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 5        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 6        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 7        Act;8            (D-24) For taxable years ending on or after 9        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 10        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 11        for the taxable year; 12            (D-25) In the case of a resident, an amount equal 13        to the amount of tax for which a credit is allowed 14        pursuant to Section 201(p)(7) of this Act; 15    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 16    following amounts:17            (E) For taxable years ending before December 31, 18        2001, any amount included in such total in respect of 19        any compensation (including but not limited to any 20        compensation paid or accrued to a serviceman while a 21        prisoner of war or missing in action) paid to a 22        resident by reason of being on active duty in the Armed 23        Forces of the United States and in respect of any 24        compensation paid or accrued to a resident who as a 25        governmental employee was a prisoner of war or missing 26        in action, and in respect of any compensation paid to a   HB3124- 16 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        resident in 1971 or thereafter for annual training 2        performed pursuant to Sections 502 and 503, Title 32, 3        United States Code as a member of the Illinois 4        National Guard or, beginning with taxable years ending 5        on or after December 31, 2007, the National Guard of 6        any other state. For taxable years ending on or after 7        December 31, 2001, any amount included in such total 8        in respect of any compensation (including but not 9        limited to any compensation paid or accrued to a 10        serviceman while a prisoner of war or missing in 11        action) paid to a resident by reason of being a member 12        of any component of the Armed Forces of the United 13        States and in respect of any compensation paid or 14        accrued to a resident who as a governmental employee 15        was a prisoner of war or missing in action, and in 16        respect of any compensation paid to a resident in 2001 17        or thereafter by reason of being a member of the 18        Illinois National Guard or, beginning with taxable 19        years ending on or after December 31, 2007, the 20        National Guard of any other state. The provisions of 21        this subparagraph (E) are exempt from the provisions 22        of Section 250;23            (F) An amount equal to all amounts included in 24        such total pursuant to the provisions of Sections 25        402(a), 402(c), 403(a), 403(b), 406(a), 407(a), and 26        408 of the Internal Revenue Code, or included in such   HB3124- 17 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        total as distributions under the provisions of any 2        retirement or disability plan for employees of any 3        governmental agency or unit, or retirement payments to 4        retired partners, which payments are excluded in 5        computing net earnings from self employment by Section 6        1402 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations 7        adopted pursuant thereto;8            (G) The valuation limitation amount;9            (H) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 10        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 11        and included in such total for the taxable year;12            (I) An amount equal to all amounts included in 13        such total pursuant to the provisions of Section 111 14        of the Internal Revenue Code as a recovery of items 15        previously deducted from adjusted gross income in the 16        computation of taxable income;17            (J) An amount equal to those dividends included in 18        such total which were paid by a corporation which 19        conducts business operations in a River Edge 20        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 21        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act, and conducts 22        substantially all of its operations in a River Edge 23        Redevelopment Zone or zones. This subparagraph (J) is 24        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;25            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 26        such total that were paid by a corporation that   HB3124- 18 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        conducts business operations in a federally designated 2        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 3        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 4        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 5        subparagraph (J) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 6        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 7        this subparagraph (K);8            (L) For taxable years ending after December 31, 9        1983, an amount equal to all social security benefits 10        and railroad retirement benefits included in such 11        total pursuant to Sections 72(r) and 86 of the 12        Internal Revenue Code;13            (M) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 14        under subparagraph (N), an amount equal to the sum of 15        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 16        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 17        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 18        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 19        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 20        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 21        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 22        Internal Revenue Code, plus, for taxable years ending 23        on or after December 31, 2011, Section 45G(e)(3) of 24        the Internal Revenue Code and, for taxable years 25        ending on or after December 31, 2008, any amount 26        included in gross income under Section 87 of the   HB3124- 19 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this 2        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section 3        250;4            (N) An amount equal to all amounts included in 5        such total which are exempt from taxation by this 6        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 7        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 8        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 9        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 10        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 11        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 12        net of bond premium amortization;13            (O) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 14        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 15        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;16            (P) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 17        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 18        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 19        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 20        the Internal Revenue Code or of any itemized deduction 21        taken from adjusted gross income in the computation of 22        taxable income for restoration of substantial amounts 23        held under claim of right for the taxable year;24            (Q) An amount equal to any amounts included in 25        such total, received by the taxpayer as an 26        acceleration in the payment of life, endowment or   HB3124- 20 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        annuity benefits in advance of the time they would 2        otherwise be payable as an indemnity for a terminal 3        illness;4            (R) An amount equal to the amount of any federal or 5        State bonus paid to veterans of the Persian Gulf War;6            (S) An amount, to the extent included in adjusted 7        gross income, equal to the amount of a contribution 8        made in the taxable year on behalf of the taxpayer to a 9        medical care savings account established under the 10        Medical Care Savings Account Act or the Medical Care 11        Savings Account Act of 2000 to the extent the 12        contribution is accepted by the account administrator 13        as provided in that Act;14            (T) An amount, to the extent included in adjusted 15        gross income, equal to the amount of interest earned 16        in the taxable year on a medical care savings account 17        established under the Medical Care Savings Account Act 18        or the Medical Care Savings Account Act of 2000 on 19        behalf of the taxpayer, other than interest added 20        pursuant to item (D-5) of this paragraph (2);21            (U) For one taxable year beginning on or after 22        January 1, 1994, an amount equal to the total amount of 23        tax imposed and paid under subsections (a) and (b) of 24        Section 201 of this Act on grant amounts received by 25        the taxpayer under the Nursing Home Grant Assistance 26        Act during the taxpayer's taxable years 1992 and 1993;  HB3124- 21 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1            (V) Beginning with tax years ending on or after 2        December 31, 1995 and ending with tax years ending on 3        or before December 31, 2004, an amount equal to the 4        amount paid by a taxpayer who is a self-employed 5        taxpayer, a partner of a partnership, or a shareholder 6        in a Subchapter S corporation for health insurance or 7        long-term care insurance for that taxpayer or that 8        taxpayer's spouse or dependents, to the extent that 9        the amount paid for that health insurance or long-term 10        care insurance may be deducted under Section 213 of 11        the Internal Revenue Code, has not been deducted on 12        the federal income tax return of the taxpayer, and 13        does not exceed the taxable income attributable to 14        that taxpayer's income, self-employment income, or 15        Subchapter S corporation income; except that no 16        deduction shall be allowed under this item (V) if the 17        taxpayer is eligible to participate in any health 18        insurance or long-term care insurance plan of an 19        employer of the taxpayer or the taxpayer's spouse. The 20        amount of the health insurance and long-term care 21        insurance subtracted under this item (V) shall be 22        determined by multiplying total health insurance and 23        long-term care insurance premiums paid by the taxpayer 24        times a number that represents the fractional 25        percentage of eligible medical expenses under Section 26        213 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 not actually   HB3124- 22 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        deducted on the taxpayer's federal income tax return;2            (W) For taxable years beginning on or after 3        January 1, 1998, all amounts included in the 4        taxpayer's federal gross income in the taxable year 5        from amounts converted from a regular IRA to a Roth 6        IRA. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 7        Section 250;8            (X) For taxable year 1999 and thereafter, an 9        amount equal to the amount of any (i) distributions, 10        to the extent includible in gross income for federal 11        income tax purposes, made to the taxpayer because of 12        his or her status as a victim of persecution for racial 13        or religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 14        regime or as an heir of the victim and (ii) items of 15        income, to the extent includible in gross income for 16        federal income tax purposes, attributable to, derived 17        from or in any way related to assets stolen from, 18        hidden from, or otherwise lost to a victim of 19        persecution for racial or religious reasons by Nazi 20        Germany or any other Axis regime immediately prior to, 21        during, and immediately after World War II, including, 22        but not limited to, interest on the proceeds 23        receivable as insurance under policies issued to a 24        victim of persecution for racial or religious reasons 25        by Nazi Germany or any other Axis regime by European 26        insurance companies immediately prior to and during   HB3124- 23 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        World War II; provided, however, this subtraction from 2        federal adjusted gross income does not apply to assets 3        acquired with such assets or with the proceeds from 4        the sale of such assets; provided, further, this 5        paragraph shall only apply to a taxpayer who was the 6        first recipient of such assets after their recovery 7        and who is a victim of persecution for racial or 8        religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 9        regime or as an heir of the victim. The amount of and 10        the eligibility for any public assistance, benefit, or 11        similar entitlement is not affected by the inclusion 12        of items (i) and (ii) of this paragraph in gross income 13        for federal income tax purposes. This paragraph is 14        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;15            (Y) For taxable years beginning on or after 16        January 1, 2002 and ending on or before December 31, 17        2004, moneys contributed in the taxable year to a 18        College Savings Pool account under Section 16.5 of the 19        State Treasurer Act, except that amounts excluded from 20        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) of the 21        Internal Revenue Code shall not be considered moneys 22        contributed under this subparagraph (Y). For taxable 23        years beginning on or after January 1, 2005, a maximum 24        of $10,000 contributed in the taxable year to (i) a 25        College Savings Pool account under Section 16.5 of the 26        State Treasurer Act or (ii) the Illinois Prepaid   HB3124- 24 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        Tuition Trust Fund, except that amounts excluded from 2        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) of the 3        Internal Revenue Code shall not be considered moneys 4        contributed under this subparagraph (Y). For purposes 5        of this subparagraph, contributions made by an 6        employer on behalf of an employee, or matching 7        contributions made by an employee, shall be treated as 8        made by the employee. This subparagraph (Y) is exempt 9        from the provisions of Section 250;10            (Z) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 11        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 12        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 13        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 14        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 15        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:16                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 17            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 18            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 19            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 20            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 21            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 22            including the bonus depreciation deduction;23                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 24            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 25            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 26            0.429); and  HB3124- 25 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1                (3) for taxable years ending after December 2            31, 2005:3                    (i) for property on which a bonus 4                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 5                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 6                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 7                by 0.429);8                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 9                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 10                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 11                1.0;12                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 13                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 14                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 15                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 16                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 17                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 18                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 19                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 20                depreciation on that property; and21                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 22                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 23                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 24                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 25                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 26                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation   HB3124- 26 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 2                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 3                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 4                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 5            The aggregate amount deducted under this 6        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 7        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 8        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 9        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 10        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 11        subparagraph (Z) is exempt from the provisions of 12        Section 250;13            (AA) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 14        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 15        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 16        addition modification under subparagraph (D-15), then 17        an amount equal to that addition modification. 18            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 19        the last day of the last tax year for which a taxpayer 20        may claim a depreciation deduction for federal income 21        tax purposes a subtraction is allowed with respect to 22        that property under subparagraph (Z) and for which the 23        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 24        addition modification under subparagraph (D-15), then 25        an amount equal to that addition modification. 26            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction   HB3124- 27 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 2        one piece of property.3            This subparagraph (AA) is exempt from the 4        provisions of Section 250;5            (BB) Any amount included in adjusted gross income, 6        other than salary, received by a driver in a 7        ridesharing arrangement using a motor vehicle;8            (CC) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 9        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 10        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 11        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 12        modification with respect to such transaction under 13        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 14        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 15        the amount of that addition modification, and (ii) any 16        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 17        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 18        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 19        that is required to make an addition modification with 20        respect to such transaction under Section 21        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 22        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of that 23        addition modification. This subparagraph (CC) is 24        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;25            (DD) An amount equal to the interest income taken 26        into account for the taxable year (net of the   HB3124- 28 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 2        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 3        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 4        for the fact that the foreign person's business 5        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 6        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 7        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 8        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 9        business group but for the fact that the person is 10        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 11        included in the unitary business group because he or 12        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 13        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 14        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 15        made for the same taxable year under Section 16        203(a)(2)(D-17) for interest paid, accrued, or 17        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 18        This subparagraph (DD) is exempt from the provisions 19        of Section 250; 20            (EE) An amount equal to the income from intangible 21        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 22        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 23        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 24        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 25        for the fact that the foreign person's business 26        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of   HB3124- 29 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 2        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 3        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 4        business group but for the fact that the person is 5        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 6        included in the unitary business group because he or 7        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 8        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 9        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 10        made for the same taxable year under Section 11        203(a)(2)(D-18) for intangible expenses and costs 12        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 13        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (EE) is 14        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;15            (FF) An amount equal to any amount awarded to the 16        taxpayer during the taxable year by the Court of 17        Claims under subsection (c) of Section 8 of the Court 18        of Claims Act for time unjustly served in a State 19        prison. This subparagraph (FF) is exempt from the 20        provisions of Section 250; 21            (GG) For taxable years ending on or after December 22        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 23        add back any insurance premiums under Section 24        203(a)(2)(D-19), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 25        that part of a reimbursement received from the 26        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense   HB3124- 30 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 2        company) that would have been taken into account as a 3        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 4        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 5        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 6        (GG), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 7        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 8        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (GG). This 9        subparagraph (GG) is exempt from the provisions of 10        Section 250; 11            (HH) For taxable years beginning on or after 12        January 1, 2018 and prior to January 1, 2028, a maximum 13        of $10,000 contributed in the taxable year to a 14        qualified ABLE account under Section 16.6 of the State 15        Treasurer Act, except that amounts excluded from gross 16        income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) or Section 17        529A(c)(1)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not 18        be considered moneys contributed under this 19        subparagraph (HH). For purposes of this subparagraph 20        (HH), contributions made by an employer on behalf of 21        an employee, or matching contributions made by an 22        employee, shall be treated as made by the employee; 23            (II) For taxable years that begin on or after 24        January 1, 2021 and begin before January 1, 2026, the 25        amount that is included in the taxpayer's federal 26        adjusted gross income pursuant to Section 61 of the   HB3124- 31 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        Internal Revenue Code as discharge of indebtedness 2        attributable to student loan forgiveness and that is 3        not excluded from the taxpayer's federal adjusted 4        gross income pursuant to paragraph (5) of subsection 5        (f) of Section 108 of the Internal Revenue Code; 6            (JJ) For taxable years beginning on or after 7        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 8        operating in this State and licensed under the 9        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 10        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 11        organization operating in this State and licensed 12        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 13        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 14        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 15        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 16        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 17        this subparagraph (JJ) are exempt from the provisions 18        of Section 250; and 19            (KK) To the extent includible in gross income for 20        federal income tax purposes, any amount awarded or 21        paid to the taxpayer as a result of a judgment or 22        settlement for fertility fraud as provided in Section 23        15 of the Illinois Fertility Fraud Act, donor 24        fertility fraud as provided in Section 20 of the 25        Illinois Fertility Fraud Act, or similar action in 26        another state; and   HB3124- 32 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1            (LL) For taxable years beginning on or after 2        January 1, 2026, if the taxpayer is a qualified 3        worker, as defined in the Workforce Development 4        through Charitable Loan Repayment Act, an amount equal 5        to the amount included in the taxpayer's federal 6        adjusted gross income that is attributable to student 7        loan repayment assistance received by the taxpayer 8        during the taxable year from a qualified community 9        foundation under the provisions of the Workforce 10        Development through Through Charitable Loan Repayment 11        Act. 12            This subparagraph (LL) is exempt from the 13        provisions of Section 250; and . 14            (MM) (LL) For taxable years beginning on or after 15        January 1, 2025, if the taxpayer is an eligible 16        resident as defined in the Medical Debt Relief Act, an 17        amount equal to the amount included in the taxpayer's 18        federal adjusted gross income that is attributable to 19        medical debt relief received by the taxpayer during 20        the taxable year from a nonprofit medical debt relief 21        coordinator under the provisions of the Medical Debt 22        Relief Act. This subparagraph (MM) (LL) is exempt from 23        the provisions of Section 250.  24    (b) Corporations.25        (1) In general. In the case of a corporation, base   HB3124- 33 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 2    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).3        (2) Modifications. The taxable income referred to in 4    paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum 5    of the following amounts:6            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 7        to the taxpayer as interest and all distributions 8        received from regulated investment companies during 9        the taxable year to the extent excluded from gross 10        income in the computation of taxable income;11            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 12        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 13        the computation of taxable income for the taxable 14        year;15            (C) In the case of a regulated investment company, 16        an amount equal to the excess of (i) the net long-term 17        capital gain for the taxable year, over (ii) the 18        amount of the capital gain dividends designated as 19        such in accordance with Section 852(b)(3)(C) of the 20        Internal Revenue Code and any amount designated under 21        Section 852(b)(3)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, 22        attributable to the taxable year (this amendatory Act 23        of 1995 (Public Act 89-89) is declarative of existing 24        law and is not a new enactment);25            (D) The amount of any net operating loss deduction 26        taken in arriving at taxable income, other than a net   HB3124- 34 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        operating loss carried forward from a taxable year 2        ending prior to December 31, 1986;3            (E) For taxable years in which a net operating 4        loss carryback or carryforward from a taxable year 5        ending prior to December 31, 1986 is an element of 6        taxable income under paragraph (1) of subsection (e) 7        or subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection 8        (e), the amount by which addition modifications other 9        than those provided by this subparagraph (E) exceeded 10        subtraction modifications in such earlier taxable 11        year, with the following limitations applied in the 12        order that they are listed:13                (i) the addition modification relating to the 14            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 15            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 16            December 31, 1986 shall be reduced by the amount 17            of addition modification under this subparagraph 18            (E) which related to that net operating loss and 19            which was taken into account in calculating the 20            base income of an earlier taxable year, and21                (ii) the addition modification relating to the 22            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 23            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 24            December 31, 1986 shall not exceed the amount of 25            such carryback or carryforward;26            For taxable years in which there is a net   HB3124- 35 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        operating loss carryback or carryforward from more 2        than one other taxable year ending prior to December 3        31, 1986, the addition modification provided in this 4        subparagraph (E) shall be the sum of the amounts 5        computed independently under the preceding provisions 6        of this subparagraph (E) for each such taxable year;7            (E-5) For taxable years ending after December 31, 8        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation 9        costs that the corporation deducted in computing 10        adjusted gross income and for which the corporation 11        claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 201;12            (E-10) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 13        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 14        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 15        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 16        the Internal Revenue Code;17            (E-11) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 18        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 19        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 20        addition modification under subparagraph (E-10), then 21        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 22        deductions taken in all taxable years under 23        subparagraph (T) with respect to that property.24            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 25        the last day of the last tax year for a taxpayer may 26        claim a depreciation deduction for federal income tax   HB3124- 36 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        purposes which a subtraction is allowed with respect 2        to that property under subparagraph (T) and for which 3        the taxpayer was allowed in any taxable year to make a 4        subtraction modification under subparagraph (T), then 5        an amount equal to that subtraction modification. 6            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 7        modification under this subparagraph only once with 8        respect to any one piece of property;9            (E-12) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 10        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 11        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 12        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 13        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 14        member of the same unitary business group but for the 15        fact the foreign person's business activity outside 16        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 17        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 18        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 19        who would be a member of the same unitary business 20        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 21        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 22        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 23        required to apportion business income under different 24        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 25        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 26        extent that dividends were included in base income of   HB3124- 37 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 2        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 3        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 4        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 5        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 6        included in gross income under Section 78 of the 7        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 8        the same person to whom the interest was paid, 9        accrued, or incurred. 10            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 11                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 12            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 13            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 14            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 15            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 16            with respect to such interest; or17                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 18            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 19            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 20            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 21            following:22                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 23                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 24                to a person that is not a related member, and25                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 26                interest expense between the taxpayer and the   HB3124- 38 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1                person did not have as a principal purpose the 2                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 3                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 4                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 5                terms; or 6                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 7            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 8            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 9            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 10            and terms and the principal purpose for the 11            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 12            or 13                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 14            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 15            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 16            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 17            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 18            to the application or use of an alternative method 19            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 20                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 21            Director from making any other adjustment 22            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 23            for any tax year beginning after the effective 24            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 25            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 26            Department and such regulations provide methods   HB3124- 39 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1            and standards by which the Department will utilize 2            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 3            (E-13) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 4        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 5        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 6        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 7        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 8        foreign person who would be a member of the same 9        unitary business group but for the fact that the 10        foreign person's business activity outside the United 11        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 12        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 13        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 14        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 15        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 16        from being included in the unitary business group 17        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 18        business income under different subsections of Section 19        304. The addition modification required by this 20        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 21        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 22        group for the same taxable year and received by the 23        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 24        business group (including amounts included in gross 25        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 26        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross   HB3124- 40 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 2        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 3        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 4        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 5        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 6        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 7        modification required under Section 203(b)(2)(E-12) of 8        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 9        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 10        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 11        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 12        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 13        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 14        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 15        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 16        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 17        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 18        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 19        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 20        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 21        similar types of intangible assets.22            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:23                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 24            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 25            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 26            is subject in a foreign country or state, other   HB3124- 41 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 2            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 3            with respect to such item; or4                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 5            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 6            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 7            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 8            following:9                    (a) the person during the same taxable 10                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 11                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 12                not a related member, and13                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 14                intangible expense or cost between the 15                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 16                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 17                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 18                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 19                or20                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 21            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 22            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 23            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 24            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 25            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 26            writing to the application or use of an   HB3124- 42 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1            alternative method of apportionment under Section 2            304(f); 3                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 4            Director from making any other adjustment 5            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 6            for any tax year beginning after the effective 7            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 8            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 9            Department and such regulations provide methods 10            and standards by which the Department will utilize 11            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 12            (E-14) For taxable years ending on or after 13        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 14        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 15        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 16        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 17        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 18        business group but for the fact that the person is 19        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 20        included in the unitary business group because he or 21        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 22        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 23        addition modification required by this subparagraph 24        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 25        included in base income of the unitary group for the 26        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a   HB3124- 43 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 2        (including amounts included in gross income under 3        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 4        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 5        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 6        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 7        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 8        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 9        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 10        the addition modification required under Section 11        203(b)(2)(E-12) or Section 203(b)(2)(E-13) of this 12        Act; 13            (E-15) For taxable years beginning after December 14        31, 2008, any deduction for dividends paid by a 15        captive real estate investment trust that is allowed 16        to a real estate investment trust under Section 17        857(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code for 18        dividends paid;19            (E-16) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 20        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 21        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 22        Act;23            (E-17) For taxable years ending on or after 24        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 25        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 26        for the taxable year;   HB3124- 44 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1            (E-18) for taxable years beginning after December 2        31, 2018, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 3        under Section 250(a)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue 4        Code for the taxable year; 5            (E-19) for taxable years ending on or after June 6        30, 2021, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 7        under Section 250(a)(1)(B)(i) of the Internal Revenue 8        Code for the taxable year; 9            (E-20) for taxable years ending on or after June 10        30, 2021, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 11        under Sections 243(e) and 245A(a) of the Internal 12        Revenue Code for the taxable year; 13            (E-21) the amount that is claimed as a federal 14        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 15        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 16        attributable to an endowment gift for which the 17        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 18        Tax Credit Act; 19    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 20    following amounts:21            (F) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 22        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 23        and included in such total for the taxable year;24            (G) An amount equal to any amount included in such 25        total under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code;26            (H) In the case of a regulated investment company,   HB3124- 45 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        an amount equal to the amount of exempt interest 2        dividends as defined in subsection (b)(5) of Section 3        852 of the Internal Revenue Code, paid to shareholders 4        for the taxable year;5            (I) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 6        under subparagraph (J), an amount equal to the sum of 7        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 8        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) and amounts disallowed as 9        interest expense by Section 291(a)(3) of the Internal 10        Revenue Code, and all amounts of expenses allocable to 11        interest and disallowed as deductions by Section 12        265(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for 13        taxable years ending on or after August 13, 1999, 14        Sections 171(a)(2), 265, 280C, 291(a)(3), and 15        832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, plus, 16        for tax years ending on or after December 31, 2011, 17        amounts disallowed as deductions by Section 45G(e)(3) 18        of the Internal Revenue Code and, for taxable years 19        ending on or after December 31, 2008, any amount 20        included in gross income under Section 87 of the 21        Internal Revenue Code and the policyholders' share of 22        tax-exempt interest of a life insurance company under 23        Section 807(a)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code (in 24        the case of a life insurance company with gross income 25        from a decrease in reserves for the tax year) or 26        Section 807(b)(1)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code (in   HB3124- 46 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        the case of a life insurance company allowed a 2        deduction for an increase in reserves for the tax 3        year); the provisions of this subparagraph are exempt 4        from the provisions of Section 250;5            (J) An amount equal to all amounts included in 6        such total which are exempt from taxation by this 7        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 8        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 9        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 10        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 11        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 12        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 13        net of bond premium amortization;14            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 15        such total which were paid by a corporation which 16        conducts business operations in a River Edge 17        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 18        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 19        all of its operations in a River Edge Redevelopment 20        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (K) is exempt from 21        the provisions of Section 250;22            (L) An amount equal to those dividends included in 23        such total that were paid by a corporation that 24        conducts business operations in a federally designated 25        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 26        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided   HB3124- 47 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 2        subparagraph (K) of paragraph 2 of this subsection 3        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 4        this subparagraph (L);5            (M) For any taxpayer that is a financial 6        organization within the meaning of Section 304(c) of 7        this Act, an amount included in such total as interest 8        income from a loan or loans made by such taxpayer to a 9        borrower, to the extent that such a loan is secured by 10        property which is eligible for the River Edge 11        Redevelopment Zone Investment Credit. To determine the 12        portion of a loan or loans that is secured by property 13        eligible for a Section 201(f) investment credit to the 14        borrower, the entire principal amount of the loan or 15        loans between the taxpayer and the borrower should be 16        divided into the basis of the Section 201(f) 17        investment credit property which secures the loan or 18        loans, using for this purpose the original basis of 19        such property on the date that it was placed in service 20        in the River Edge Redevelopment Zone. The subtraction 21        modification available to the taxpayer in any year 22        under this subsection shall be that portion of the 23        total interest paid by the borrower with respect to 24        such loan attributable to the eligible property as 25        calculated under the previous sentence. This 26        subparagraph (M) is exempt from the provisions of   HB3124- 48 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        Section 250;2            (M-1) For any taxpayer that is a financial 3        organization within the meaning of Section 304(c) of 4        this Act, an amount included in such total as interest 5        income from a loan or loans made by such taxpayer to a 6        borrower, to the extent that such a loan is secured by 7        property which is eligible for the High Impact 8        Business Investment Credit. To determine the portion 9        of a loan or loans that is secured by property eligible 10        for a Section 201(h) investment credit to the 11        borrower, the entire principal amount of the loan or 12        loans between the taxpayer and the borrower should be 13        divided into the basis of the Section 201(h) 14        investment credit property which secures the loan or 15        loans, using for this purpose the original basis of 16        such property on the date that it was placed in service 17        in a federally designated Foreign Trade Zone or 18        Sub-Zone located in Illinois. No taxpayer that is 19        eligible for the deduction provided in subparagraph 20        (M) of paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be 21        eligible for the deduction provided under this 22        subparagraph (M-1). The subtraction modification 23        available to taxpayers in any year under this 24        subsection shall be that portion of the total interest 25        paid by the borrower with respect to such loan 26        attributable to the eligible property as calculated   HB3124- 49 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        under the previous sentence;2            (N) Two times any contribution made during the 3        taxable year to a designated zone organization to the 4        extent that the contribution (i) qualifies as a 5        charitable contribution under subsection (c) of 6        Section 170 of the Internal Revenue Code and (ii) 7        must, by its terms, be used for a project approved by 8        the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 9        under Section 11 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act 10        or under Section 10-10 of the River Edge Redevelopment 11        Zone Act. This subparagraph (N) is exempt from the 12        provisions of Section 250;13            (O) An amount equal to: (i) 85% for taxable years 14        ending on or before December 31, 1992, or, a 15        percentage equal to the percentage allowable under 16        Section 243(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 17        for taxable years ending after December 31, 1992, of 18        the amount by which dividends included in taxable 19        income and received from a corporation that is not 20        created or organized under the laws of the United 21        States or any state or political subdivision thereof, 22        including, for taxable years ending on or after 23        December 31, 1988, dividends received or deemed 24        received or paid or deemed paid under Sections 951 25        through 965 of the Internal Revenue Code, exceed the 26        amount of the modification provided under subparagraph   HB3124- 50 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        (G) of paragraph (2) of this subsection (b) which is 2        related to such dividends, and including, for taxable 3        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, dividends 4        received from a captive real estate investment trust; 5        plus (ii) 100% of the amount by which dividends, 6        included in taxable income and received, including, 7        for taxable years ending on or after December 31, 8        1988, dividends received or deemed received or paid or 9        deemed paid under Sections 951 through 964 of the 10        Internal Revenue Code and including, for taxable years 11        ending on or after December 31, 2008, dividends 12        received from a captive real estate investment trust, 13        from any such corporation specified in clause (i) that 14        would but for the provisions of Section 1504(b)(3) of 15        the Internal Revenue Code be treated as a member of the 16        affiliated group which includes the dividend 17        recipient, exceed the amount of the modification 18        provided under subparagraph (G) of paragraph (2) of 19        this subsection (b) which is related to such 20        dividends. For taxable years ending on or after June 21        30, 2021, (i) for purposes of this subparagraph, the 22        term "dividend" does not include any amount treated as 23        a dividend under Section 1248 of the Internal Revenue 24        Code, and (ii) this subparagraph shall not apply to 25        dividends for which a deduction is allowed under 26        Section 245(a) of the Internal Revenue Code. This   HB3124- 51 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        subparagraph (O) is exempt from the provisions of 2        Section 250 of this Act;3            (P) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 4        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 5        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;6            (Q) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 7        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 8        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 9        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 10        the Internal Revenue Code;11            (R) On and after July 20, 1999, in the case of an 12        attorney-in-fact with respect to whom an interinsurer 13        or a reciprocal insurer has made the election under 14        Section 835 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 15        835, an amount equal to the excess, if any, of the 16        amounts paid or incurred by that interinsurer or 17        reciprocal insurer in the taxable year to the 18        attorney-in-fact over the deduction allowed to that 19        interinsurer or reciprocal insurer with respect to the 20        attorney-in-fact under Section 835(b) of the Internal 21        Revenue Code for the taxable year; the provisions of 22        this subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of 23        Section 250;24            (S) For taxable years ending on or after December 25        31, 1997, in the case of a Subchapter S corporation, an 26        amount equal to all amounts of income allocable to a   HB3124- 52 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        shareholder subject to the Personal Property Tax 2        Replacement Income Tax imposed by subsections (c) and 3        (d) of Section 201 of this Act, including amounts 4        allocable to organizations exempt from federal income 5        tax by reason of Section 501(a) of the Internal 6        Revenue Code. This subparagraph (S) is exempt from the 7        provisions of Section 250;8            (T) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 9        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 10        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 11        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 12        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 13        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:14                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 15            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 16            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 17            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 18            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 19            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 20            including the bonus depreciation deduction;21                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 22            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 23            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 24            0.429); and25                (3) for taxable years ending after December 26            31, 2005:  HB3124- 53 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1                    (i) for property on which a bonus 2                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 3                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 4                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 5                by 0.429);6                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 7                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 8                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 9                1.0;10                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 11                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 12                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 13                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 14                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 15                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 16                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 17                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 18                depreciation on that property; and19                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 20                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 21                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 22                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 23                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 24                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 25                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 26                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the   HB3124- 54 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 2                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 3            The aggregate amount deducted under this 4        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 5        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 6        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 7        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 8        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 9        subparagraph (T) is exempt from the provisions of 10        Section 250;11            (U) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 12        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 13        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 14        modification under subparagraph (E-10), then an amount 15        equal to that addition modification.16            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 17        the last day of the last tax year for which a taxpayer 18        may claim a depreciation deduction for federal income 19        tax purposes a subtraction is allowed with respect to 20        that property under subparagraph (T) and for which the 21        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 22        addition modification under subparagraph (E-10), then 23        an amount equal to that addition modification. 24            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 25        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 26        one piece of property.  HB3124- 55 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1            This subparagraph (U) is exempt from the 2        provisions of Section 250;3            (V) The amount of: (i) any interest income (net of 4        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 5        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 6        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 7        modification with respect to such transaction under 8        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 9        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 10        the amount of such addition modification, (ii) any 11        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 12        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 13        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 14        that is required to make an addition modification with 15        respect to such transaction under Section 16        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 17        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 18        addition modification, and (iii) any insurance premium 19        income (net of deductions allocable thereto) taken 20        into account for the taxable year with respect to a 21        transaction with a taxpayer that is required to make 22        an addition modification with respect to such 23        transaction under Section 203(a)(2)(D-19), Section 24        203(b)(2)(E-14), Section 203(c)(2)(G-14), or Section 25        203(d)(2)(D-9), but not to exceed the amount of that 26        addition modification. This subparagraph (V) is exempt   HB3124- 56 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        from the provisions of Section 250; 2            (W) An amount equal to the interest income taken 3        into account for the taxable year (net of the 4        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 5        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 6        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 7        for the fact that the foreign person's business 8        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 9        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 10        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 11        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 12        business group but for the fact that the person is 13        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 14        included in the unitary business group because he or 15        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 16        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 17        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 18        made for the same taxable year under Section 19        203(b)(2)(E-12) for interest paid, accrued, or 20        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 21        This subparagraph (W) is exempt from the provisions of 22        Section 250; 23            (X) An amount equal to the income from intangible 24        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 25        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 26        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a   HB3124- 57 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 2        for the fact that the foreign person's business 3        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 4        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 5        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 6        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 7        business group but for the fact that the person is 8        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 9        included in the unitary business group because he or 10        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 11        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 12        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 13        made for the same taxable year under Section 14        203(b)(2)(E-13) for intangible expenses and costs 15        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 16        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (X) is 17        exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 18            (Y) For taxable years ending on or after December 19        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 20        add back any insurance premiums under Section 21        203(b)(2)(E-14), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 22        that part of a reimbursement received from the 23        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 24        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 25        company) that would have been taken into account as a 26        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the   HB3124- 58 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 2        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 3        (Y), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 4        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 5        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (Y). This 6        subparagraph (Y) is exempt from the provisions of 7        Section 250; 8            (Z) The difference between the nondeductible 9        controlled foreign corporation dividends under Section 10        965(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code over the 11        taxable income of the taxpayer, computed without 12        regard to Section 965(e)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue 13        Code, and without regard to any net operating loss 14        deduction. This subparagraph (Z) is exempt from the 15        provisions of Section 250; and 16            (AA) For taxable years beginning on or after 17        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 18        operating in this State and licensed under the 19        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 20        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 21        organization operating in this State and licensed 22        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 23        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 24        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 25        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 26        added back under this subsection. The provisions of   HB3124- 59 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        this subparagraph (AA) are exempt from the provisions 2        of Section 250. 3        (3) Special rule. For purposes of paragraph (2)(A), 4    "gross income" in the case of a life insurance company, 5    for tax years ending on and after December 31, 1994, and 6    prior to December 31, 2011, shall mean the gross 7    investment income for the taxable year and, for tax years 8    ending on or after December 31, 2011, shall mean all 9    amounts included in life insurance gross income under 10    Section 803(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. 11    (c) Trusts and estates.12        (1) In general. In the case of a trust or estate, base 13    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 14    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).15        (2) Modifications. Subject to the provisions of 16    paragraph (3), the taxable income referred to in paragraph 17    (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum of the 18    following amounts:19            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 20        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 21        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 22        in the computation of taxable income;23            (B) In the case of (i) an estate, $600; (ii) a 24        trust which, under its governing instrument, is 25        required to distribute all of its income currently,   HB3124- 60 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        $300; and (iii) any other trust, $100, but in each such 2        case, only to the extent such amount was deducted in 3        the computation of taxable income;4            (C) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 5        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 6        the computation of taxable income for the taxable 7        year;8            (D) The amount of any net operating loss deduction 9        taken in arriving at taxable income, other than a net 10        operating loss carried forward from a taxable year 11        ending prior to December 31, 1986;12            (E) For taxable years in which a net operating 13        loss carryback or carryforward from a taxable year 14        ending prior to December 31, 1986 is an element of 15        taxable income under paragraph (1) of subsection (e) 16        or subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection 17        (e), the amount by which addition modifications other 18        than those provided by this subparagraph (E) exceeded 19        subtraction modifications in such taxable year, with 20        the following limitations applied in the order that 21        they are listed:22                (i) the addition modification relating to the 23            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 24            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 25            December 31, 1986 shall be reduced by the amount 26            of addition modification under this subparagraph   HB3124- 61 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1            (E) which related to that net operating loss and 2            which was taken into account in calculating the 3            base income of an earlier taxable year, and4                (ii) the addition modification relating to the 5            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 6            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 7            December 31, 1986 shall not exceed the amount of 8            such carryback or carryforward;9            For taxable years in which there is a net 10        operating loss carryback or carryforward from more 11        than one other taxable year ending prior to December 12        31, 1986, the addition modification provided in this 13        subparagraph (E) shall be the sum of the amounts 14        computed independently under the preceding provisions 15        of this subparagraph (E) for each such taxable year;16            (F) For taxable years ending on or after January 17        1, 1989, an amount equal to the tax deducted pursuant 18        to Section 164 of the Internal Revenue Code if the 19        trust or estate is claiming the same tax for purposes 20        of the Illinois foreign tax credit under Section 601 21        of this Act;22            (G) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 23        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 24        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 25        computation of taxable income;26            (G-5) For taxable years ending after December 31,   HB3124- 62 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation 2        costs that the trust or estate deducted in computing 3        adjusted gross income and for which the trust or 4        estate claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 5        201;6            (G-10) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 7        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 8        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 9        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 10        the Internal Revenue Code; and11            (G-11) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 12        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 13        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 14        addition modification under subparagraph (G-10), then 15        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 16        deductions taken in all taxable years under 17        subparagraph (R) with respect to that property.18            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 19        the last day of the last tax year for which a taxpayer 20        may claim a depreciation deduction for federal income 21        tax purposes a subtraction is allowed with respect to 22        that property under subparagraph (R) and for which the 23        taxpayer was allowed in any taxable year to make a 24        subtraction modification under subparagraph (R), then 25        an amount equal to that subtraction modification. 26            The taxpayer is required to make the addition   HB3124- 63 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        modification under this subparagraph only once with 2        respect to any one piece of property;3            (G-12) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 4        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 5        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 6        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 7        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 8        member of the same unitary business group but for the 9        fact that the foreign person's business activity 10        outside the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 11        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 12        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 13        who would be a member of the same unitary business 14        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 15        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 16        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 17        required to apportion business income under different 18        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 19        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 20        extent that dividends were included in base income of 21        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 22        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 23        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 24        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 25        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 26        included in gross income under Section 78 of the   HB3124- 64 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 2        the same person to whom the interest was paid, 3        accrued, or incurred. 4            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 5                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 6            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 7            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 8            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 9            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 10            with respect to such interest; or11                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 12            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 13            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 14            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 15            following:16                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 17                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 18                to a person that is not a related member, and19                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 20                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 21                person did not have as a principal purpose the 22                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 23                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 24                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 25                terms; or 26                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on   HB3124- 65 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 2            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 3            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 4            and terms and the principal purpose for the 5            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 6            or 7                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 8            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 9            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 10            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 11            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 12            to the application or use of an alternative method 13            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 14                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 15            Director from making any other adjustment 16            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 17            for any tax year beginning after the effective 18            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 19            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 20            Department and such regulations provide methods 21            and standards by which the Department will utilize 22            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 23            (G-13) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 24        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 25        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 26        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable   HB3124- 66 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 2        foreign person who would be a member of the same 3        unitary business group but for the fact that the 4        foreign person's business activity outside the United 5        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 6        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 7        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 8        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 9        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 10        from being included in the unitary business group 11        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 12        business income under different subsections of Section 13        304. The addition modification required by this 14        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 15        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 16        group for the same taxable year and received by the 17        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 18        business group (including amounts included in gross 19        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 20        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross 21        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 22        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 23        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 24        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 25        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 26        dividends caused a reduction to the addition   HB3124- 67 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        modification required under Section 203(c)(2)(G-12) of 2        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 3        "intangible expenses and costs" includes: (1) 4        expenses, losses, and costs for or related to the 5        direct or indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or 6        management, ownership, sale, exchange, or any other 7        disposition of intangible property; (2) losses 8        incurred, directly or indirectly, from factoring 9        transactions or discounting transactions; (3) royalty, 10        patent, technical, and copyright fees; (4) licensing 11        fees; and (5) other similar expenses and costs. For 12        purposes of this subparagraph, "intangible property" 13        includes patents, patent applications, trade names, 14        trademarks, service marks, copyrights, mask works, 15        trade secrets, and similar types of intangible assets.16            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:17                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 18            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 19            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 20            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 21            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 22            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 23            with respect to such item; or24                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 25            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 26            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based   HB3124- 68 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 2            following:3                    (a) the person during the same taxable 4                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 5                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 6                not a related member, and7                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 8                intangible expense or cost between the 9                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 10                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 11                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 12                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 13                or14                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 15            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 16            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 17            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 18            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 19            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 20            writing to the application or use of an 21            alternative method of apportionment under Section 22            304(f); 23                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 24            Director from making any other adjustment 25            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 26            for any tax year beginning after the effective   HB3124- 69 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 2            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 3            Department and such regulations provide methods 4            and standards by which the Department will utilize 5            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 6            (G-14) For taxable years ending on or after 7        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 8        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 9        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 10        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 11        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 12        business group but for the fact that the person is 13        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 14        included in the unitary business group because he or 15        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 16        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 17        addition modification required by this subparagraph 18        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 19        included in base income of the unitary group for the 20        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 21        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 22        (including amounts included in gross income under 23        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 24        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 25        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 26        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs   HB3124- 70 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 2        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 3        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 4        the addition modification required under Section 5        203(c)(2)(G-12) or Section 203(c)(2)(G-13) of this 6        Act;7            (G-15) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 8        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 9        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 10        Act;11            (G-16) For taxable years ending on or after 12        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 13        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 14        for the taxable year; 15            (G-17) the amount that is claimed as a federal 16        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 17        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 18        attributable to an endowment gift for which the 19        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 20        Tax Credit Act; 21    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 22    following amounts:23            (H) An amount equal to all amounts included in 24        such total pursuant to the provisions of Sections 25        402(a), 402(c), 403(a), 403(b), 406(a), 407(a) and 408 26        of the Internal Revenue Code or included in such total   HB3124- 71 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        as distributions under the provisions of any 2        retirement or disability plan for employees of any 3        governmental agency or unit, or retirement payments to 4        retired partners, which payments are excluded in 5        computing net earnings from self employment by Section 6        1402 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations 7        adopted pursuant thereto;8            (I) The valuation limitation amount;9            (J) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 10        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 11        and included in such total for the taxable year;12            (K) An amount equal to all amounts included in 13        taxable income as modified by subparagraphs (A), (B), 14        (C), (D), (E), (F) and (G) which are exempt from 15        taxation by this State either by reason of its 16        statutes or Constitution or by reason of the 17        Constitution, treaties or statutes of the United 18        States; provided that, in the case of any statute of 19        this State that exempts income derived from bonds or 20        other obligations from the tax imposed under this Act, 21        the amount exempted shall be the interest net of bond 22        premium amortization;23            (L) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 24        under subparagraph (K), an amount equal to the sum of 25        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 26        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code,   HB3124- 72 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 2        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 3        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 4        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 5        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 6        Internal Revenue Code, plus, (iii) for taxable years 7        ending on or after December 31, 2011, Section 8        45G(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and, for 9        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, 10        any amount included in gross income under Section 87 11        of the Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this 12        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section 13        250;14            (M) An amount equal to those dividends included in 15        such total which were paid by a corporation which 16        conducts business operations in a River Edge 17        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 18        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 19        all of its operations in a River Edge Redevelopment 20        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (M) is exempt from 21        the provisions of Section 250;22            (N) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 23        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 24        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;25            (O) An amount equal to those dividends included in 26        such total that were paid by a corporation that   HB3124- 73 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        conducts business operations in a federally designated 2        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 3        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 4        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 5        subparagraph (M) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 6        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 7        this subparagraph (O);8            (P) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 9        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 10        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 11        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 12        the Internal Revenue Code;13            (Q) For taxable year 1999 and thereafter, an 14        amount equal to the amount of any (i) distributions, 15        to the extent includible in gross income for federal 16        income tax purposes, made to the taxpayer because of 17        his or her status as a victim of persecution for racial 18        or religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 19        regime or as an heir of the victim and (ii) items of 20        income, to the extent includible in gross income for 21        federal income tax purposes, attributable to, derived 22        from or in any way related to assets stolen from, 23        hidden from, or otherwise lost to a victim of 24        persecution for racial or religious reasons by Nazi 25        Germany or any other Axis regime immediately prior to, 26        during, and immediately after World War II, including,   HB3124- 74 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        but not limited to, interest on the proceeds 2        receivable as insurance under policies issued to a 3        victim of persecution for racial or religious reasons 4        by Nazi Germany or any other Axis regime by European 5        insurance companies immediately prior to and during 6        World War II; provided, however, this subtraction from 7        federal adjusted gross income does not apply to assets 8        acquired with such assets or with the proceeds from 9        the sale of such assets; provided, further, this 10        paragraph shall only apply to a taxpayer who was the 11        first recipient of such assets after their recovery 12        and who is a victim of persecution for racial or 13        religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 14        regime or as an heir of the victim. The amount of and 15        the eligibility for any public assistance, benefit, or 16        similar entitlement is not affected by the inclusion 17        of items (i) and (ii) of this paragraph in gross income 18        for federal income tax purposes. This paragraph is 19        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;20            (R) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 21        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 22        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 23        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 24        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 25        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:26                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation   HB3124- 75 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 2            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 3            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 4            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 5            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 6            including the bonus depreciation deduction;7                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 8            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 9            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 10            0.429); and11                (3) for taxable years ending after December 12            31, 2005:13                    (i) for property on which a bonus 14                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 15                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 16                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 17                by 0.429);18                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 19                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 20                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 21                1.0;22                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 23                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 24                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 25                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 26                depreciation deduction that would be allowed   HB3124- 76 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 2                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 3                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 4                depreciation on that property; and5                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 6                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 7                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 8                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 9                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 10                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 11                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 12                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 13                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 14                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 15            The aggregate amount deducted under this 16        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 17        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 18        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 19        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 20        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 21        subparagraph (R) is exempt from the provisions of 22        Section 250;23            (S) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 24        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 25        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 26        modification under subparagraph (G-10), then an amount   HB3124- 77 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        equal to that addition modification.2            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 3        the last day of the last tax year for which a taxpayer 4        may claim a depreciation deduction for federal income 5        tax purposes a subtraction is allowed with respect to 6        that property under subparagraph (R) and for which the 7        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 8        addition modification under subparagraph (G-10), then 9        an amount equal to that addition modification. 10            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 11        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 12        one piece of property.13            This subparagraph (S) is exempt from the 14        provisions of Section 250;15            (T) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 16        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 17        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 18        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 19        modification with respect to such transaction under 20        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 21        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 22        the amount of such addition modification and (ii) any 23        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 24        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 25        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 26        that is required to make an addition modification with   HB3124- 78 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        respect to such transaction under Section 2        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 3        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 4        addition modification. This subparagraph (T) is exempt 5        from the provisions of Section 250; 6            (U) An amount equal to the interest income taken 7        into account for the taxable year (net of the 8        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 9        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 10        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 11        for the fact the foreign person's business activity 12        outside the United States is 80% or more of that 13        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 14        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 15        who would be a member of the same unitary business 16        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 17        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 18        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 19        required to apportion business income under different 20        subsections of Section 304, but not to exceed the 21        addition modification required to be made for the same 22        taxable year under Section 203(c)(2)(G-12) for 23        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 24        indirectly, to the same person. This subparagraph (U) 25        is exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 26            (V) An amount equal to the income from intangible   HB3124- 79 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 2        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 3        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 4        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 5        for the fact that the foreign person's business 6        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 7        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 8        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 9        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 10        business group but for the fact that the person is 11        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 12        included in the unitary business group because he or 13        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 14        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 15        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 16        made for the same taxable year under Section 17        203(c)(2)(G-13) for intangible expenses and costs 18        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 19        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (V) is 20        exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 21            (W) in the case of an estate, an amount equal to 22        all amounts included in such total pursuant to the 23        provisions of Section 111 of the Internal Revenue Code 24        as a recovery of items previously deducted by the 25        decedent from adjusted gross income in the computation 26        of taxable income. This subparagraph (W) is exempt   HB3124- 80 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        from Section 250; 2            (X) an amount equal to the refund included in such 3        total of any tax deducted for federal income tax 4        purposes, to the extent that deduction was added back 5        under subparagraph (F). This subparagraph (X) is 6        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;7            (Y) For taxable years ending on or after December 8        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 9        add back any insurance premiums under Section 10        203(c)(2)(G-14), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 11        that part of a reimbursement received from the 12        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 13        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 14        company) that would have been taken into account as a 15        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 16        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 17        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 18        (Y), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 19        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 20        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (Y). This 21        subparagraph (Y) is exempt from the provisions of 22        Section 250;23            (Z) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 24        2018 and before January 1, 2026, the amount of excess 25        business loss of the taxpayer disallowed as a 26        deduction by Section 461(l)(1)(B) of the Internal   HB3124- 81 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        Revenue Code; and 2            (AA) For taxable years beginning on or after 3        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 4        operating in this State and licensed under the 5        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 6        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 7        organization operating in this State and licensed 8        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 9        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 10        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 11        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 12        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 13        this subparagraph (AA) are exempt from the provisions 14        of Section 250. 15        (3) Limitation. The amount of any modification 16    otherwise required under this subsection shall, under 17    regulations prescribed by the Department, be adjusted by 18    any amounts included therein which were properly paid, 19    credited, or required to be distributed, or permanently 20    set aside for charitable purposes pursuant to Internal 21    Revenue Code Section 642(c) during the taxable year. 22    (d) Partnerships.23        (1) In general. In the case of a partnership, base 24    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 25    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).  HB3124- 82 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        (2) Modifications. The taxable income referred to in 2    paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum 3    of the following amounts:4            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 5        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 6        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 7        in the computation of taxable income;8            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 9        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income for 10        the taxable year;11            (C) The amount of deductions allowed to the 12        partnership pursuant to Section 707 (c) of the 13        Internal Revenue Code in calculating its taxable 14        income;15            (D) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 16        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 17        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 18        computation of taxable income;19            (D-5) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 20        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 21        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 22        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 23        the Internal Revenue Code;24            (D-6) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 25        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 26        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an   HB3124- 83 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        addition modification under subparagraph (D-5), then 2        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 3        deductions taken in all taxable years under 4        subparagraph (O) with respect to that property.5            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 6        the last day of the last tax year for which a taxpayer 7        may claim a depreciation deduction for federal income 8        tax purposes a subtraction is allowed with respect to 9        that property under subparagraph (O) and for which the 10        taxpayer was allowed in any taxable year to make a 11        subtraction modification under subparagraph (O), then 12        an amount equal to that subtraction modification. 13            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 14        modification under this subparagraph only once with 15        respect to any one piece of property;16            (D-7) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 17        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 18        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 19        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 20        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 21        member of the same unitary business group but for the 22        fact the foreign person's business activity outside 23        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 24        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 25        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 26        who would be a member of the same unitary business   HB3124- 84 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 2        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 3        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 4        required to apportion business income under different 5        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 6        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 7        extent that dividends were included in base income of 8        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 9        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 10        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 11        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 12        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 13        included in gross income under Section 78 of the 14        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 15        the same person to whom the interest was paid, 16        accrued, or incurred. 17            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 18                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 19            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 20            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 21            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 22            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 23            with respect to such interest; or24                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 25            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 26            the taxpayer can establish, based on a   HB3124- 85 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 2            following:3                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 4                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 5                to a person that is not a related member, and6                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 7                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 8                person did not have as a principal purpose the 9                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 10                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 11                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 12                terms; or 13                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 14            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 15            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 16            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 17            and terms and the principal purpose for the 18            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 19            or 20                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 21            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 22            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 23            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 24            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 25            to the application or use of an alternative method 26            of apportionment under Section 304(f).   HB3124- 86 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 2            Director from making any other adjustment 3            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 4            for any tax year beginning after the effective 5            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 6            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 7            Department and such regulations provide methods 8            and standards by which the Department will utilize 9            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; and 10            (D-8) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 11        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 12        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 13        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 14        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 15        foreign person who would be a member of the same 16        unitary business group but for the fact that the 17        foreign person's business activity outside the United 18        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 19        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 20        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 21        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 22        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 23        from being included in the unitary business group 24        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 25        business income under different subsections of Section 26        304. The addition modification required by this   HB3124- 87 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 2        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 3        group for the same taxable year and received by the 4        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 5        business group (including amounts included in gross 6        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 7        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross 8        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 9        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 10        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 11        indirectly paid, incurred or accrued. The preceding 12        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 13        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 14        modification required under Section 203(d)(2)(D-7) of 15        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 16        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 17        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 18        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 19        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 20        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 21        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 22        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 23        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 24        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 25        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 26        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service   HB3124- 88 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 2        similar types of intangible assets;3            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:4                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 5            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 6            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 7            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 8            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 9            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 10            with respect to such item; or11                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 12            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 13            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 14            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 15            following:16                    (a) the person during the same taxable 17                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 18                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 19                not a related member, and20                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 21                intangible expense or cost between the 22                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 23                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 24                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 25                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 26                or  HB3124- 89 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 2            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 3            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 4            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 5            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 6            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 7            writing to the application or use of an 8            alternative method of apportionment under Section 9            304(f); 10                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 11            Director from making any other adjustment 12            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 13            for any tax year beginning after the effective 14            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 15            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 16            Department and such regulations provide methods 17            and standards by which the Department will utilize 18            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 19            (D-9) For taxable years ending on or after 20        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 21        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 22        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 23        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 24        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 25        business group but for the fact that the person is 26        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being   HB3124- 90 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        included in the unitary business group because he or 2        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 3        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 4        addition modification required by this subparagraph 5        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 6        included in base income of the unitary group for the 7        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 8        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 9        (including amounts included in gross income under 10        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 11        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 12        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 13        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 14        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 15        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 16        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 17        the addition modification required under Section 18        203(d)(2)(D-7) or Section 203(d)(2)(D-8) of this Act;19            (D-10) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 20        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 21        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 22        Act;23            (D-11) For taxable years ending on or after 24        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 25        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 26        for the taxable year;   HB3124- 91 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1            (D-12) the amount that is claimed as a federal 2        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 3        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 4        attributable to an endowment gift for which the 5        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 6        Tax Credit Act; 7    and by deducting from the total so obtained the following 8    amounts:9            (E) The valuation limitation amount;10            (F) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 11        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 12        and included in such total for the taxable year;13            (G) An amount equal to all amounts included in 14        taxable income as modified by subparagraphs (A), (B), 15        (C) and (D) which are exempt from taxation by this 16        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 17        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 18        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 19        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 20        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 21        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 22        net of bond premium amortization;23            (H) Any income of the partnership which 24        constitutes personal service income as defined in 25        Section 1348(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code (as in 26        effect December 31, 1981) or a reasonable allowance   HB3124- 92 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        for compensation paid or accrued for services rendered 2        by partners to the partnership, whichever is greater; 3        this subparagraph (H) is exempt from the provisions of 4        Section 250;5            (I) An amount equal to all amounts of income 6        distributable to an entity subject to the Personal 7        Property Tax Replacement Income Tax imposed by 8        subsections (c) and (d) of Section 201 of this Act 9        including amounts distributable to organizations 10        exempt from federal income tax by reason of Section 11        501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code; this subparagraph 12        (I) is exempt from the provisions of Section 250;13            (J) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 14        under subparagraph (G), an amount equal to the sum of 15        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 16        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 17        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 18        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 19        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 20        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 21        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 22        Internal Revenue Code, plus, (iii) for taxable years 23        ending on or after December 31, 2011, Section 24        45G(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and, for 25        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, 26        any amount included in gross income under Section 87   HB3124- 93 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        of the Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this 2        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section 3        250;4            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 5        such total which were paid by a corporation which 6        conducts business operations in a River Edge 7        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 8        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 9        all of its operations from a River Edge Redevelopment 10        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (K) is exempt from 11        the provisions of Section 250;12            (L) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 13        job training project established pursuant to the Real 14        Property Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;15            (M) An amount equal to those dividends included in 16        such total that were paid by a corporation that 17        conducts business operations in a federally designated 18        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 19        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 20        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 21        subparagraph (K) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 22        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 23        this subparagraph (M);24            (N) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 25        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 26        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of   HB3124- 94 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 2        the Internal Revenue Code;3            (O) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 4        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 5        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 6        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 7        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 8        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:9                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 10            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 11            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 12            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 13            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 14            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 15            including the bonus depreciation deduction;16                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 17            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 18            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 19            0.429); and20                (3) for taxable years ending after December 21            31, 2005:22                    (i) for property on which a bonus 23                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 24                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 25                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 26                by 0.429);  HB3124- 95 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 2                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 3                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 4                1.0;5                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 6                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 7                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 8                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 9                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 10                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 11                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 12                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 13                depreciation on that property; and14                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 15                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 16                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 17                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 18                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 19                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 20                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 21                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 22                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 23                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 24            The aggregate amount deducted under this 25        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 26        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus   HB3124- 96 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 2        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 3        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 4        subparagraph (O) is exempt from the provisions of 5        Section 250;6            (P) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 7        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 8        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 9        modification under subparagraph (D-5), then an amount 10        equal to that addition modification.11            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 12        the last day of the last tax year for which a taxpayer 13        may claim a depreciation deduction for federal income 14        tax purposes a subtraction is allowed with respect to 15        that property under subparagraph (O) and for which the 16        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 17        addition modification under subparagraph (D-5), then 18        an amount equal to that addition modification. 19            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 20        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 21        one piece of property.22            This subparagraph (P) is exempt from the 23        provisions of Section 250;24            (Q) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 25        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 26        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction   HB3124- 97 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 2        modification with respect to such transaction under 3        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 4        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 5        the amount of such addition modification and (ii) any 6        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 7        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 8        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 9        that is required to make an addition modification with 10        respect to such transaction under Section 11        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 12        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 13        addition modification. This subparagraph (Q) is exempt 14        from Section 250; 15            (R) An amount equal to the interest income taken 16        into account for the taxable year (net of the 17        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 18        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 19        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 20        for the fact that the foreign person's business 21        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 22        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 23        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 24        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 25        business group but for the fact that the person is 26        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being   HB3124- 98 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        included in the unitary business group because he or 2        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 3        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 4        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 5        made for the same taxable year under Section 6        203(d)(2)(D-7) for interest paid, accrued, or 7        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 8        This subparagraph (R) is exempt from Section 250; 9            (S) An amount equal to the income from intangible 10        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 11        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 12        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 13        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 14        for the fact that the foreign person's business 15        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 16        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 17        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 18        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 19        business group but for the fact that the person is 20        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 21        included in the unitary business group because he or 22        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 23        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 24        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 25        made for the same taxable year under Section 26        203(d)(2)(D-8) for intangible expenses and costs paid,   HB3124- 99 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to the 2        same person. This subparagraph (S) is exempt from 3        Section 250; 4            (T) For taxable years ending on or after December 5        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 6        add back any insurance premiums under Section 7        203(d)(2)(D-9), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 8        that part of a reimbursement received from the 9        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 10        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 11        company) that would have been taken into account as a 12        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 13        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 14        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 15        (T), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 16        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 17        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (T). This 18        subparagraph (T) is exempt from the provisions of 19        Section 250; and 20            (U) For taxable years beginning on or after 21        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 22        operating in this State and licensed under the 23        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 24        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 25        organization operating in this State and licensed 26        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis   HB3124- 100 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 2        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 3        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 4        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 5        this subparagraph (U) are exempt from the provisions 6        of Section 250.  7    (e) Gross income; adjusted gross income; taxable income.8        (1) In general. Subject to the provisions of paragraph 9    (2) and subsection (b)(3), for purposes of this Section 10    and Section 803(e), a taxpayer's gross income, adjusted 11    gross income, or taxable income for the taxable year shall 12    mean the amount of gross income, adjusted gross income or 13    taxable income properly reportable for federal income tax 14    purposes for the taxable year under the provisions of the 15    Internal Revenue Code. Taxable income may be less than 16    zero. However, for taxable years ending on or after 17    December 31, 1986, net operating loss carryforwards from 18    taxable years ending prior to December 31, 1986, may not 19    exceed the sum of federal taxable income for the taxable 20    year before net operating loss deduction, plus the excess 21    of addition modifications over subtraction modifications 22    for the taxable year. For taxable years ending prior to 23    December 31, 1986, taxable income may never be an amount 24    in excess of the net operating loss for the taxable year as 25    defined in subsections (c) and (d) of Section 172 of the   HB3124- 101 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1    Internal Revenue Code, provided that when taxable income 2    of a corporation (other than a Subchapter S corporation), 3    trust, or estate is less than zero and addition 4    modifications, other than those provided by subparagraph 5    (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection (b) for corporations or 6    subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection (c) for 7    trusts and estates, exceed subtraction modifications, an 8    addition modification must be made under those 9    subparagraphs for any other taxable year to which the 10    taxable income less than zero (net operating loss) is 11    applied under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code or 12    under subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 13    (e) applied in conjunction with Section 172 of the 14    Internal Revenue Code.15        (2) Special rule. For purposes of paragraph (1) of 16    this subsection, the taxable income properly reportable 17    for federal income tax purposes shall mean:18            (A) Certain life insurance companies. In the case 19        of a life insurance company subject to the tax imposed 20        by Section 801 of the Internal Revenue Code, life 21        insurance company taxable income, plus the amount of 22        distribution from pre-1984 policyholder surplus 23        accounts as calculated under Section 815a of the 24        Internal Revenue Code;25            (B) Certain other insurance companies. In the case 26        of mutual insurance companies subject to the tax   HB3124- 102 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        imposed by Section 831 of the Internal Revenue Code, 2        insurance company taxable income;3            (C) Regulated investment companies. In the case of 4        a regulated investment company subject to the tax 5        imposed by Section 852 of the Internal Revenue Code, 6        investment company taxable income;7            (D) Real estate investment trusts. In the case of 8        a real estate investment trust subject to the tax 9        imposed by Section 857 of the Internal Revenue Code, 10        real estate investment trust taxable income;11            (E) Consolidated corporations. In the case of a 12        corporation which is a member of an affiliated group 13        of corporations filing a consolidated income tax 14        return for the taxable year for federal income tax 15        purposes, taxable income determined as if such 16        corporation had filed a separate return for federal 17        income tax purposes for the taxable year and each 18        preceding taxable year for which it was a member of an 19        affiliated group. For purposes of this subparagraph, 20        the taxpayer's separate taxable income shall be 21        determined as if the election provided by Section 22        243(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code had been in 23        effect for all such years;24            (F) Cooperatives. In the case of a cooperative 25        corporation or association, the taxable income of such 26        organization determined in accordance with the   HB3124- 103 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        provisions of Section 1381 through 1388 of the 2        Internal Revenue Code, but without regard to the 3        prohibition against offsetting losses from patronage 4        activities against income from nonpatronage 5        activities; except that a cooperative corporation or 6        association may make an election to follow its federal 7        income tax treatment of patronage losses and 8        nonpatronage losses. In the event such election is 9        made, such losses shall be computed and carried over 10        in a manner consistent with subsection (a) of Section 11        207 of this Act and apportioned by the apportionment 12        factor reported by the cooperative on its Illinois 13        income tax return filed for the taxable year in which 14        the losses are incurred. The election shall be 15        effective for all taxable years with original returns 16        due on or after the date of the election. In addition, 17        the cooperative may file an amended return or returns, 18        as allowed under this Act, to provide that the 19        election shall be effective for losses incurred or 20        carried forward for taxable years occurring prior to 21        the date of the election. Once made, the election may 22        only be revoked upon approval of the Director. The 23        Department shall adopt rules setting forth 24        requirements for documenting the elections and any 25        resulting Illinois net loss and the standards to be 26        used by the Director in evaluating requests to revoke   HB3124- 104 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        elections. Public Act 96-932 is declaratory of 2        existing law; 3            (G) Subchapter S corporations. In the case of: (i) 4        a Subchapter S corporation for which there is in 5        effect an election for the taxable year under Section 6        1362 of the Internal Revenue Code, the taxable income 7        of such corporation determined in accordance with 8        Section 1363(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, except 9        that taxable income shall take into account those 10        items which are required by Section 1363(b)(1) of the 11        Internal Revenue Code to be separately stated; and 12        (ii) a Subchapter S corporation for which there is in 13        effect a federal election to opt out of the provisions 14        of the Subchapter S Revision Act of 1982 and have 15        applied instead the prior federal Subchapter S rules 16        as in effect on July 1, 1982, the taxable income of 17        such corporation determined in accordance with the 18        federal Subchapter S rules as in effect on July 1, 19        1982; and20            (H) Partnerships. In the case of a partnership, 21        taxable income determined in accordance with Section 22        703 of the Internal Revenue Code, except that taxable 23        income shall take into account those items which are 24        required by Section 703(a)(1) to be separately stated 25        but which would be taken into account by an individual 26        in calculating his taxable income.  HB3124- 105 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        (3) Recapture of business expenses on disposition of 2    asset or business. Notwithstanding any other law to the 3    contrary, if in prior years income from an asset or 4    business has been classified as business income and in a 5    later year is demonstrated to be non-business income, then 6    all expenses, without limitation, deducted in such later 7    year and in the 2 immediately preceding taxable years 8    related to that asset or business that generated the 9    non-business income shall be added back and recaptured as 10    business income in the year of the disposition of the 11    asset or business. Such amount shall be apportioned to 12    Illinois using the greater of the apportionment fraction 13    computed for the business under Section 304 of this Act 14    for the taxable year or the average of the apportionment 15    fractions computed for the business under Section 304 of 16    this Act for the taxable year and for the 2 immediately 17    preceding taxable years.  18    (f) Valuation limitation amount.19        (1) In general. The valuation limitation amount 20    referred to in subsections (a)(2)(G), (c)(2)(I) and 21    (d)(2)(E) is an amount equal to:22            (A) The sum of the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 23        amounts (to the extent consisting of gain reportable 24        under the provisions of Section 1245 or 1250 of the 25        Internal Revenue Code) for all property in respect of   HB3124- 106 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        which such gain was reported for the taxable year; 2        plus3            (B) The lesser of (i) the sum of the pre-August 1, 4        1969 appreciation amounts (to the extent consisting of 5        capital gain) for all property in respect of which 6        such gain was reported for federal income tax purposes 7        for the taxable year, or (ii) the net capital gain for 8        the taxable year, reduced in either case by any amount 9        of such gain included in the amount determined under 10        subsection (a)(2)(F) or (c)(2)(H).11        (2) Pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation amount.12            (A) If the fair market value of property referred 13        to in paragraph (1) was readily ascertainable on 14        August 1, 1969, the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 15        amount for such property is the lesser of (i) the 16        excess of such fair market value over the taxpayer's 17        basis (for determining gain) for such property on that 18        date (determined under the Internal Revenue Code as in 19        effect on that date), or (ii) the total gain realized 20        and reportable for federal income tax purposes in 21        respect of the sale, exchange or other disposition of 22        such property.23            (B) If the fair market value of property referred 24        to in paragraph (1) was not readily ascertainable on 25        August 1, 1969, the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 26        amount for such property is that amount which bears   HB3124- 107 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b1        the same ratio to the total gain reported in respect of 2        the property for federal income tax purposes for the 3        taxable year, as the number of full calendar months in 4        that part of the taxpayer's holding period for the 5        property ending July 31, 1969 bears to the number of 6        full calendar months in the taxpayer's entire holding 7        period for the property.8            (C) The Department shall prescribe such 9        regulations as may be necessary to carry out the 10        purposes of this paragraph. 11    (g) Double deductions. Unless specifically provided 12otherwise, nothing in this Section shall permit the same item 13to be deducted more than once. 14    (h) Legislative intention. Except as expressly provided by 15this Section there shall be no modifications or limitations on 16the amounts of income, gain, loss or deduction taken into 17account in determining gross income, adjusted gross income or 18taxable income for federal income tax purposes for the taxable 19year, or in the amount of such items entering into the 20computation of base income and net income under this Act for 21such taxable year, whether in respect of property values as of 22August 1, 1969 or otherwise.23(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 24102-658, eff. 8-27-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1112, eff.   HB3124- 108 -LRB104 10028 HLH 20099 b112-21-22; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-478, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, 2Article 10, Section 10-900, eff. 6-7-24; 103-592, Article 170, 3Section 170-90, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-647, 4eff. 7-1-24; revised 8-20-24.)